New York, session 2025-2026, S2048.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14 of the transportation law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 37 to read as follows: 3 37. To establish a publicly available central registry of all 4 reports, audits, plans and public inspections regarding freight rail 5 operators, freight rail cars and train sets, freight lines or routes, 6 and freight railroad corporation rights of way. Such reports shall 7 include, without limitation, daily inspection reports, safety plans, 8 track inspection reports, bridge and tunnel inspection reports, safety 9 incident reports, and annual bridge and tunnel certifications by such 10 railroad corporations. The commissioner or such commissioner's designee 11 shall maintain and regularly update such registry. Provided, further, 12 that the commissioner or such commissioner's designee may redact any 13 records or portions thereof that are specifically exempted from disclo- 14 sure by state or federal statute or regulation. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 17 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 18 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 19 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00359-01-5